Montana, session 2025, HB941.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:

NEW SECTION. Section 1. Transfer of interest earnings from American Rescue Plan Act. By [10
days after the effective date of this act], the state treasurer shall transfer all interest earnings on funds from the
American Rescue Plan Act of 2021, Public Law 117-2, as provided in 31 CFR, part 35, into the coal severance
tax permanent fund established in 17-5-703 pursuant to Article IX, section 5, of the Montana constitution.

NEW SECTION. Section 2. Appropriation. There is appropriated $100 from the general fund to the
department of revenue for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, for the purposes of implementing [this act].

COORDINATION SECTION. Section 3. Coordination instruction. (1) If both [this act] and House
Bill No. 4 are passed and approved, then the following language in [section 2 of House Bill No. 4] under
"Governor's Office, Office of Budget and Program Planning" is struck from House Bill No. 4:
"All remaining fiscal year 2025 federal budget amendment authority for the following is
authorized to continue into federal fiscal year 2027:
- 31 CFR, part 35"
(2) If [this act] is passed and approved and Senate Bill No. 90 is not passed and approved, then
[section 1 of this act] must be amended as follows:
"NEW SECTION. Section 1. Transfer of interest earnings from American Rescue Plan Act. By
[10 days after the effective date of this act], the state treasurer shall transfer all interest earnings on funds from
the American Rescue Plan Act of 2021, Public Law 117-2, as provided in 31 CFR, part 35, into the Montana
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – HB 941

****
69th Legislature 2025 HB 941.1
coal endowment regional water system fund established in 17-5-703."

NEW SECTION. Section 4. Effective date. [This act] is effective on passage and approval.
- END -
- 2 - Authorized Print Version – HB 941